Louisiana, session 2026, HB1053.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:2(7) and 241(24) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 26:4
and 273.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the respective
meanings ascribed to them in this Section, unless a different meaning clearly appears
from the context:
* * *
(7) "Dealer" means any person who, as a business, manufactures, blends,
rectifies, distills, processes, imports, stores, uses, handles, holds, sells, offers for sale,
solicits orders for the sale of, distributes, delivers, serves, or transports any alcoholic
beverage in the this state or engages herein in any business transaction relating to any
such alcoholic beverage. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Paragraph, for
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1053 ENROLLED
purposes of this Chapter, "dealer" shall not be construed to include a retailer of
goods or services whose business operations do not include the sale of alcoholic
beverages and that may offer or furnish an alcoholic beverage to one or more
customers solely on a complimentary basis, without direct or indirect consideration,
and only as incidental to its principal business. Such complimentary service does not
constitute engaging in the business of dealing in alcoholic beverages and does not
require a permit pursuant to this Chapter, provided that all alcoholic beverages are
purchased from a retailer licensed in this state.
* * *
§4. Complimentary alcoholic beverage service; requirements and limitations;
exemption from permit requirement
A. For the purposes of this Section, "complimentary service" means
providing an alcoholic beverage to a patron, customer, or guest at no charge. No fee
or consideration of any kind may be imposed as a condition of, or in exchange for,
access to or receipt of any alcoholic beverage. Any reimbursement or cost recovery
through any mechanism, including bundling with any good or service, or any charge
for entry, admission, cover, or service associated in any manner with access to such
beverages constitutes a sale for purposes of this Chapter.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the permit
requirement of this Chapter does not apply to a business offering alcoholic beverages
on a complimentary basis in strict accordance with all of the following conditions:
(1) All costs associated with complimentary service shall be borne
exclusively by the business. All alcoholic beverages offered pursuant to this Section
shall be purchased from a retailer duly licensed in accordance with this Title. All
invoices, receipts, and records related to the purchases shall be maintained by the
business for a minimum of two years and may be subject to inspection upon request
by the commissioner.
(2) No manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer licensed in accordance with this
Title shall directly or indirectly subsidize, donate, discount, or otherwise defray the
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1053 ENROLLED
cost of any alcoholic beverage offered as a complimentary service as described in
this Section.
(3) A business offering complimentary service remains subject to all
applicable state and local ordinances including excise, sales, and consumption taxes.
(4) A business offering alcoholic beverages on a complimentary basis shall
not do any of the following:
(a) Advertise, promote, or otherwise communicate the availability of
complimentary alcoholic beverages through any medium, including interior or
exterior signage, printed materials, electronic media, or social media.
(b) Operate a backbar, wet bar, bar counter, or any similar dedicated alcohol
service structure on its premises nor publicly display any alcoholic beverages.
(c) Provide more than two servings no greater than standard industry sizes
per person per day. All beverages shall be served by the business in single-use
disposable drinkware. The business shall not allow the patron to remove the
complimentary alcoholic beverage from the premises.
(d) Serve alcoholic beverages to any person under twenty-one years of age
or to any visibly intoxicated person. Violation subjects the business and any
responsible individual to the penalties provided in R.S. 14:93.10 et seq., and all other
applicable law.
C. The exemption provided by this Section does not apply to any business
that is otherwise required to hold a permit pursuant to this Chapter by reason of
engaging in the dealing, sale, or service of alcoholic beverages as a primary or
substantial component of its business operations.
D. The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
* * *
§241. Definitions
The following terms have the respective meanings ascribed to them except
in those instances where the context indicates a different meaning:
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1053 ENROLLED
(24) "Retail dealer" means every person who offers for sale, exposes for sale,
has in his possession for sale or distribution, or sells alcoholic beverages in any
quantity to persons other than licensed wholesale or retail dealers. Notwithstanding
the provisions of this Paragraph, for purposes of this Chapter, "retail dealer" shall not
be construed to include a retailer of goods or services whose business operations do
not include the sale of alcoholic beverages and that may offer or furnish an alcoholic
beverage to one or more customers solely on a complimentary basis, without direct
or indirect consideration, and only as incidental to its principal business. Such
complimentary service does not constitute engaging in the business of dealing in
alcoholic beverages and does not require a permit pursuant to this Chapter, provided
that all alcoholic beverages are purchased from a retailer licensed in this state.
* * *
§273.1. Complimentary alcoholic beverage service; requirements and limitations;
exemption from permit requirement
A. For the purposes of this Section, "complimentary service" means
providing an alcoholic beverage to a patron, customer, or guest at no charge. No fee
or consideration of any kind may be imposed as a condition of, or in exchange for,
access to or receipt of any alcoholic beverage. Any reimbursement or cost recovery
through any mechanism, including bundling with any good or service, or any charge
for entry, admission, cover, or service associated in any manner with access to such
beverages constitutes a sale for purposes of this Chapter.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the permit
requirement of this Chapter does not apply to a business offering alcoholic beverages
on a complimentary basis in strict accordance with all of the following conditions:
(1) All costs associated with complimentary service shall be borne
exclusively by the business. All alcoholic beverages offered pursuant to this Section
shall be purchased from a retailer duly licensed in accordance with this Title. All
invoices, receipts, and records related to the purchases shall be maintained by the
business for a minimum of two years and may be subject to inspection upon request
by the commissioner.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1053 ENROLLED
(2) No manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer licensed in accordance with this
Title shall directly or indirectly subsidize, donate, discount, or otherwise defray the
cost of any alcoholic beverage offered as a complimentary service as described in
this Section.
(3) A business offering complimentary service remains subject to all
applicable state and local ordinances including excise, sales, and consumption taxes.
(4) A business offering alcoholic beverages on a complimentary basis shall
not do any of the following:
(a) Advertise, promote, or otherwise communicate the availability of
complimentary alcoholic beverages through any medium, including interior or
exterior signage, printed materials, electronic media, or social media.
(b) Operate a backbar, wet bar, bar counter, or any similar dedicated alcohol
service structure on its premises nor publicly display any alcoholic beverages.
(c) Provide more than two servings no greater than standard industry sizes
per person per day. All beverages shall be served by the business in single-use
disposable drinkware. The business shall not allow the patron to remove the
complimentary alcoholic beverage from the premises.
(d) Serve alcoholic beverages to any person under twenty-one years of age
or to any visibly intoxicated person. Violation subjects the business and any
responsible individual to the penalties provided in R.S. 14:93.10 et seq., and all other
applicable law.
C. The exemption provided by this Section does not apply to any business
that is otherwise required to hold a permit pursuant to this Chapter by reason of
engaging in the dealing, sale, or service of alcoholic beverages as a primary or
substantial component of its business operations.
D. The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1053 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.